Indiana, session 2026, HB1405.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-7-2-91.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 91.7. "Generic name", for purposes of IC 12-10-16.5,
has the meaning set forth in IC 12-10-16.5-2.
SECTION 2. IC 12-7-2-146, AS AMENDED BY P.L.174-2025,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 146. "Program" refers to the following:
(1) For purposes of IC 12-10-5.7, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-10-5.7-2.
(2) For purposes of IC 12-10-7, the adult guardianship services
program established by IC 12-10-7-5.
(3) For purposes of IC 12-10-10, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-10-10-5.
(4) For purposes of IC 12-10-16.5, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-10-16.5-3.
(4) (5) For purposes of IC 12-15-12.7, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-15-12.7-1.
2026 IN 1405—LS 7016/DI 104


(5) (6) For purposes of IC 12-17.2-2-14.2, the meaning set forth
in IC 12-17.2-2-14.2(a).
(6) (7) For purposes of IC 12-17.6, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-17.6-1-5.
SECTION 3. IC 12-10-16.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 16.5. Prescription Drug Assistance Program for the
Elderly
Sec. 1. (a) The program under this chapter is in addition to the
Indiana prescription drug program administered under
IC 12-10-16.
(b) The division shall implement the program beginning
January 1, 2027.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "generic name" means the
official or established name given to a drug by the United States
Adopted Names Council.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "program" refers to the
prescription drug assistance program for the elderly established by
section 4 of this chapter.
Sec. 4. (a) The prescription drug assistance program for the
elderly is established to be administered by the division.
(b) The program is subject to the availability of funding for the
program.
Sec. 5. (a) An individual must apply for the program in the
manner prescribed by the division.
(b) An individual is eligible to participate in the program if the
individual meets the following requirements:
(1) Is a resident of Indiana.
(2) Is at least sixty-five (65) years of age.
(3) Is not a Medicaid recipient under IC 12-15.
(4) Pays the deductible set forth in section 6 of this chapter.
(5) Pays the annual enrollment fee of thirty dollars ($30).
(6) Submits the information prescribed by the division,
including information to determine the household income for
use in determining the applicable deductible for the individual
under section 6 of this chapter.
(c) The division shall determine whether an applicant meets the
requirements to participate in the program. The division shall issue
a prescription drug card to an individual approved to participate
in the program to use in the purchase of a prescription drug under
the program.
2026 IN 1405—LS 7016/DI 104


Sec. 6. (a) A program participant shall pay a deductible for
prescription drugs for a twelve (12) month period that is based on
the individual's household federal income poverty level as follows:
(1) For a household income that is one hundred sixty percent
(160%) of the federal income poverty level or less, no
deductible.
(2) For a household income that is more than one hundred
sixty percent (160%) of the federal income poverty level but
not more than two hundred percent (200%) of the federal
income poverty level, a deductible of five hundred dollars
($500).
(3) For a household income that is more than two hundred
percent (200%) of the federal income poverty level but not
more than two hundred forty percent (240%) of the federal
income poverty level, a deductible of eight hundred fifty
dollars ($850).
(4) For a household income that is greater than two hundred
forty percent (240%) of the federal income poverty level, a
deductible that includes both of the following:
(A) The difference between the individual's annual
household income and two hundred forty percent (240%)
of the federal income poverty level for the same household
size as the individual's household.
(B) Eight hundred fifty dollars ($850).
The division shall negotiate prescription drug prices for individuals
described in subdivisions (1) through (3) to purchase prescription
drugs at a reduced rate while meeting the individual's deductible.
(b) The copayments in this subsection do not apply if the
program participant pays for a prescription drug using other
prescription drug coverage available to the participant. A program
participant shall, after any applicable deductible is paid under
subsection (a), pay a copayment for each prescription drug as
follows:
(1) For a prescription drug that bears only a generic name, a
copayment of five dollars ($5).
(2) For a prescription drug that does not bear only a generic
name, a copayment of fifteen dollars ($15).
Sec. 7. A program participant may purchase not more than a
one hundred (100) day supply of a prescription drug at the
copayment set forth in section 6(b) of this chapter if the
prescription drug:
(1) is dispensed in accordance with the health care provider's
2026 IN 1405—LS 7016/DI 104


prescription; and
(2) has been approved by the office by rules adopted under
IC 4-22-2 to be dispensed in an amount that exceeds thirty
(30) days.
Sec. 8. (a) The division shall enter into agreements with
pharmacies and pharmacists as providers under the program.
(b) A pharmacy or pharmacist that is a program provider and
fills prescriptions under the program may not charge a participant
who presents a valid prescription order and program card to the
pharmacy or pharmacist more than the following:
(1) For a deductible if the participant has not met the
deductible for the participant's twelve (12) month period of
the program, an amount for the prescription drug not to
exceed the applicable amount described in section 6(a) of this
chapter.
(2) After any applicable deductible has been met by the
participant, the applicable copayment specified in section 6(b)
of this chapter for the participant for the prescription drug.
The pharmacy or pharmacist provider may not collect a dispensing
fee from a participant for a prescription drug purchased under the
program.
(c) The division shall calculate and transmit to a pharmacy and
pharmacist that are providers under the program data that may be
used in calculating charges under subsection (b). The division shall
periodically update and transmit the necessary information to the
pharmacy and pharmacist providers.
Sec. 9. The division shall negotiate with a drug manufacturer
that sells prescription drugs in Indiana to enter into drug rebate
agreements for the program established under this chapter that are
modeled after the rebate agreements set forth in 42 U.S.C. 1396r-8.
A drug rebate agreement under this section must meet the
following:
(1) The drug manufacturer makes rebate payments on at least
a quarterly basis to the division for each of the drug
manufacturer's prescription drugs purchased by a program
participant under the program. The division shall deposit the
rebates into the fund established by section 11 of this chapter.
(2) The amount of the rebate payment is determined in the
same manner as the method set forth in 42 U.S.C. 1396r-8(c).
Sec. 10. (a) The division shall establish the following:
(1) A schedule for payments to a pharmacy and pharmacist
provider under the program modeled after the schedule used
2026 IN 1405—LS 7016/DI 104


under the Medicaid program for prescription drugs sold to
participants under the program after the participant's
deductible is met.
(2) A claims form prescribed by the division to be used by a
pharmacy or pharmacist provider under the program.
(b) A payment under this section for a claim submitted by a
pharmacy or pharmacist provider under this chapter must include
the following:
(1) The program payment rate minus any copayment paid by
the participant.
(2) If applicable, any incentive payment, as determined by the
division.
(c) The division may implement utilization and cost controls for
the program that are similar to those used under the Medicaid
program.
(d) The division may contract with a third party to provide
claims payment services.
Sec. 11. (a) The prescription drug assistance program for the
elderly fund is established for purposes of administering the
program. The fund shall be administered by the division.
(b) The fund consists of the following:
(1) Money appropriated to the fund.
(2) Prescription drug rebates collected under this chapter.
(c) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(d) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that
accrues from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(e) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
Sec. 12. (a) The division shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
prevent fraud in the program.
(b) An individual who is convicted of committing fraud in the
furnishing or purchase of prescription drugs under this chapter
commits a Class A misdemeanor.
Sec. 13. The division may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 necessary
to implement this chapter.
SECTION 4. IC 35-52-12-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. IC 12-10-16.5-12 defines a
crime concerning fraud in the prescription drug assistance
2026 IN 1405—LS 7016/DI 104


program for the elderly.
2026 IN 1405—LS 7016/DI 104